North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-16 Trial by the Court [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure]

28-16-01.
Decision to be in writing — When due. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 52.

28-16-02.
Facts and conclusions separately stated. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 52.

28-16-03.
How findings waived. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 52.

28-16-04.
Preparation of findings by parties. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-16-05.
Amendment of findings. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 52.

28-16-06.
Judgment upon issue of law. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 12, 56.